Utah statutes.
78B-15-203.   Consequences of establishment of parentage.

Unless parental rights are terminated, a parent-child relationship established under this chapter applies for all purposes, except as otherwise specifically provided by other law of this state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

